Hawaii, session 2026, SB2843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 19, Session Laws of Hawaii 2020, is amended by amending section 15 to read as follows: "SECTION 15.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2021; provided that [sections]: (1)  Sections 2[, 3,] and 4 shall be repealed on June 30, 2026; provided further that sections 706-623[, 709‑906,] and 853‑4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which they read on the day prior to the effective date of this Act[.]; and (2)  Section 3 shall be repealed on June 30, 2031; provided further that section 709-906, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the day prior to the effective date of this Act." SECTION 2.  Act 238, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, is amended by amending section 4 to read as follows: "SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that section 1 shall be repealed on June 30, [2026;] 2031; provided further that section 709-906, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on December 31, 2020." SECTION 3.  Act 23, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as amended by section 15 of Act 178, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by amending section 7 to read as follows: "SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that the amendments made to section 709-906, Hawaii Revised Statutes, by section 4 of this Act shall not be repealed when that section is reenacted on June 30, [2026,] 2031, pursuant to: (1)  Section 15 of Act 19, Session Laws of Hawaii 2020; and (2)  Section 4 of Act 238, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on June 29, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________